Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska34-112.01
Division fence; entry upon land authorized.

An owner of land may enter upon adjacent land owned by another person to construct, maintain, or repair a division fence pursuant to sections 34-102 and 34-112, but such access shall be allowed only to the extent reasonably necessary to construct, maintain, or repair the division fence. This section does not authorize any alterations to adjacent land owned by another person, including the removal of trees, buildings, or other obstacles, without the consent of the adjacent landowner or a court order or the removal of any items of personal property lying thereon without the consent of the adjacent landowner or a court order.

Laws 2007, LB108, § 5.